Hawaii statutes.
§674-4 Tenure and compensation of members.
The term of office of each member of the panel shall be until December 31,
1999. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy shall be appointed by the
governor for the remainder of the term. A vacancy in the panel shall not
affect its powers.

Each member of the panel shall be compensated
at the rate of $100 per day for each day's actual attendance to the member's
duties; provided that the compensation shall not exceed a maximum of $10,000
per year. The members of the panel shall be paid their necessary traveling and
subsistence expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties. Expenses
incurred under this section shall be paid by the department of commerce and
consumer affairs. [L 1991, c 323, pt of §1; am L 1993, c 351, §2; am L 1997, c
382, §4]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next